New Jersey, session 221, A5008.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2004, c.48 (C.52:17C-19) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  There is established in the Department of the Treasury within the General Fund a special account to be known as the "9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account." b.    Funds credited to the "9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account" shall be annually appropriated for the purposes of paying:  (1) eligible costs pursuant to the provisions of sections 13 and 14 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-13 and C.52:17C-14); (2) the costs of funding the State's capital equipment (including debt service), facilities and operating expenses that arise from emergency response; (3) the cost of emergency response training, including any related costs or expenses of the Office of Emergency Management in the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (4) the cost of operating the Office of Emergency Telecommunications Services created pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-3); (5) the cost of operating the Statewide Public Safety Communications Commission created pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2011, c.4 (C.52:17C-3.2); (6) any costs associated with implementing any requirement of the Federal Communications Commission concerning 9-1-1 service that is not otherwise allocated to a carrier and not eligible for reimbursement under law or regulation; (7) any costs associated with planning, designing, or implementing an automatic location identification technology that is not otherwise allocated to a wireless carrier and not eligible for reimbursement under law or regulation; [and] (8) any costs associated with planning, designing, or acquiring replacement equipment or systems (including debt service) related to the enhanced 9-1-1 network as defined by subsection e. of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-1); and (9) any costs associated with recruitment and retention of first responders. c.     Five percent of funds credited to the 9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account shall be annually appropriated to the New Jersey EMS Task Force. (cf: P.L.2013, c.245, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.